California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 233, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12729.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Violations of Sections 12714, 12714.5, and 12715 are infractions, except as otherwise provided in Section 12718. Every person convicted of an infraction pursuant to this subdivision shall be punished as follows:

(1) For the first conviction, a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) For a second conviction within a period of one year, a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200).

(3) For a third or subsequent conviction within a period of one year, a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) A violation of Section 12722 by a vehicle hauling bulk tomatoes is an infraction. Every person convicted of an infraction pursuant to this subdivision shall be punished as follows:

(1) For a vehicle that exceeds the tolerance provided by regulations adopted pursuant to Section 12723 by less than 50 percent, a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200).

(2) For a vehicle that exceeds the tolerance provided by regulations adopted pursuant to Section 12723 by 50 to 100 percent, inclusive, a fine not exceeding four hundred dollars ($400).

(3) For a vehicle that exceeds the tolerance provided by regulations adopted pursuant to Section 12723 by more than 100 percent, a fine not exceeding eight hundred dollars ($800).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 529, Sec. 1) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12730.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 12701 or this section, farm products sold by bulk weight or delivered to a processing or conditioning establishment for processing, conditioning, or sale, shall be weighed by a weighmaster, and a weighmaster certificate of the weight shall be issued to the producer with a duplicate copy issued to the buyer, conditioner, or processor.

(b) When the processing or conditioning charges or purchase is based on the bulk weight of the finished product, the finished product shall also be weighed by a weighmaster, and a second weighmaster certificate shall be issued to the producer with a duplicate copy issued to the buyer, conditioner, or processor.

(c) A producer whose product is delivered, but is not sold, to a processor or conditioner for processing or conditioning, may waive, in writing, his or her right to have the product weighed when the processing or conditioning establishment is operated by a producer of farm products and the processing or conditioning is incidental to the production of farm products. As used in this subdivision, “incidental” means that the income derived from the processing or conditioning operation represents not more than 25 percent of the total income of the producer operating the processing or conditioning establishment.

(d) This section does not apply to any nonprofit cooperative association that is organized and operating pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code, except as to that portion of activities that involves the handling or dealing in any farm product of any nonmember of the nonprofit cooperative association.

(e) Subdivision (a), as it applies to tree nuts delivered for processing or conditioning, does not apply to tree nut hullers and shellers, if there is a written contract which waives the producer’s right to have the unprocessed or unconditioned product weighed. Notwithstanding the waiver, the finished product shall be weighed by a weighmaster and a weighmaster certificate shall be issued to the grower, with a duplicate copy issued to the buyer, conditioner, or processor.

(f) The term “farm products” includes all agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, and vegetable products of the soil, flaxseed, and cottonseed, but does not include timber, timber products, milk, and milk products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 273, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12731.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, where livestock is sold on the basis of weight at a public sales yard, or by or at any livestock market, market agency, or dealer which is subject to the Packers and Stockyards Act of 1921 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.), the livestock shall be weighed by a weighmaster, and a weighmaster certificate shall be issued to the buyer and seller.

(b) The term “livestock” includes cattle, sheep, swine, horses, mules, and goats.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12732.

In addition to the certificate requirements of Sections 12714, 12714.5, and 12715, all of the following information shall appear on weighmaster certificates issued when adjustments are made to the load and the weights are determined at other than the site where the vehicle was loaded:

(a) The gross weight of the commodity and the vehicle at the time of the initial weighing.

(b) The gross weight of the commodity and the vehicle after the adjustment.

(c) The name and address of the seller and of either the purchaser or broker of the commodity as provided by the driver of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 405, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

12733.

In all cases where scrap metal and salvage materials are purchased or sold by dealers, brokers, or commission merchants on the basis of weight or measure, the quantity of the scrap metal and salvage material shall be determined by a weighmaster, and a weighmaster certificate shall be issued to the seller and buyer. Settlement for the materials shall be made on the quantity shown thereon. If the quantity indications are readily accessible and clearly readable to both the buyer and seller, at the time of determination, a weighmaster certificate is required to be issued only when requested by the buyer or seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 818, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

12734.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the weight of squid, Pacific whiting, or anchovy, certified pursuant to this chapter, may be determined by computation based upon volumetric measurement of containers as prescribed by regulations adopted by the secretary. This section does not apply to squid, Pacific whiting, or anchovy delivered for the purpose of retorting or reducing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 66.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12735.

The secretary may adopt any rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Adoption of these rules and regulations shall be in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 48.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12737.

(a) Any weighmaster weighing any vehicle moving construction materials, including, but not limited to, earth, stone, rock, sand, gravel, limestone, ready mixed concrete, cementitious materials, recycled construction materials, or asphalt paving materials may use an unattended weighing system to weigh the vehicle and to issue a weighmaster certificate to buyers who opt to utilize the unattended system, provided that the system and the operation of the system comply with regulations or policies issued by the secretary. The name of the principal weighmaster and the unique system identification number of the unattended weighing system utilized shall be imprinted on the weighmaster certificate and this shall satisfy the requirements of subdivision
 (c) of Section 12715. Nothing in this section impacts existing weighing and ticketing systems.

(b) (1) A weighmaster shall pay the department the following license fee for each license year as applicable to the operation:

(A) Seventy-five dollars ($75) if the weighmaster is operating at a fixed location.

(B) Thirty dollars ($30) for each additional fixed location at which the weighmaster is operating.

(C) Two hundred dollars ($200) if the weighmaster is operating at other than a fixed location.

(D) Twenty dollars ($20) for each deputy weighmaster.

(2) Any fee imposed pursuant to this section shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory costs to the department of enforcing this section.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “License year” means the period of time beginning with the first day of the month the weighmaster is required to be licensed in this state, and ending on the date designated by the secretary for expiration of the license, or yearly intervals after the first renewal.

(2) “Location” means a premise on which weighing, measuring, or counting devices are used.

(3) “Principal weighmaster” means the person or entity identified on
 the weighmaster certificate, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 12714, that may employ or designate any person to act for the weighmaster as a deputy weighmaster pursuant to Section 12710.

(4) “Unattended weighing system” means an automated system not directly under the supervision of a weighmaster that meets the approval, testing, and sealing requirements of Section 12717.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 344, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 68.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Special Provisions Relating to Farm Products [12925. - 12930.]



  ARTICLE 2. Wool Products [12925. - 12925.]

12925.

No person purchasing wool from a producer shall make a specific deduction for tags, fribs, crutchings or other off-wools, either on a basis of the percentage of the weight or percentage of the value of the wool. Any provision in a contract to purchase wool from a producer, providing for such a deduction, is invalid.

Violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Cotton [12930. - 12930.]

12930.

As used in this article “cotton” includes raw cotton, cotton linters, and cotton batting. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or any other law, cotton may be sold by gross weight so that the purchaser pays a like price for the cotton and the burlap, paper, or other material with which it is wrapped and the string, wire, or other material with which the wrapping is secured. When sold by gross weight cotton shall be wrapped and the wrapping secured in accordance with the usual customs of the trade or in accordance with the agreement of purchaser and seller.

A weighmaster may use a tare weight for baled cotton specified by regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture for determining the net weight of cotton.

The tare shall not exceed five percent (5%) of such gross weight.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to apply to the sale of cotton or cotton goods in any form packaged for distribution or sale at retail to the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Automatic Checkout Systems [13300. - 13356.]



  ARTICLE 1. Point-Of-Sale Displays [13300. - 13303.]

13300.

(a) The operator of a business establishment that uses a point-of-sale system to sell goods or services to consumers shall ensure that the price of each good or service to be paid by the consumer is conspicuously displayed to the consumer at the time that the price is interpreted by the system. In any instance in which the business advertises a price reduction or discount regarding an item offered for sale, the checkout system customer indicator shall display either the discounted price for that item, or alternatively, the regular price and a credit or reduction of the advertised savings. Any surcharges and the total value to be charged for the overall transaction also shall be displayed for the consumer at least once before the consumer is required to pay for the goods or services. The checkout system customer indicator shall be so positioned, and the prices and amounts displayed shall be of a size and form, as to be easily viewable from a typical and reasonable customer position at each checkout location.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “point-of-sale system” means any computer or electronic system used by a retail establishment such as, but not limited to, Universal Product Code scanners, price lookup codes, or an electronic price lookup system as a means for determining the price of the item being purchased by a consumer.

(c) All point-of-sale systems used by a business establishment on and after January 1, 2007, shall comply with the requirement of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 566, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13301.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the Attorney General, the district attorney, or city attorney may enforce the provisions of this chapter in accordance with the provisions of Division 5 (commencing with Section 12001) or any other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 818, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13303.

The secretary may adopt necessary rules and regulations regarding the accuracy of automated systems for retail commodity price charging referred to as “scanners.”

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12736 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 49.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Point-Of-Sale System Accuracy Verification [13350. - 13356.]

13350.

(a) The board of supervisors of any county or city and county that has adopted or that adopts an ordinance for the purposes of determining the pricing accuracy of a retail establishment using a point-of-sale (POS) system, shall base the initial standard inspection of the POS system on the following criteria:

(1) The initial standard inspection shall be performed by collecting a random sample of items that shall include a maximum of 50 percent sale items from either:

(i) One department of a retail store.

(ii) Multiple areas of a retail store.

(iii) The entire store.

(2) The initial standard inspection shall be performed by testing a minimum random sample of 10 items for a retail establishment with three or fewer POS checkout registers.

(3) The initial standard inspection shall be performed by testing a minimum random sample of 25 items for a retail establishment with 4 to 9 POS checkout registers.

(4) The initial standard inspection shall be performed by testing a minimum random sample of 50 items for retail establishments with 10 or more POS checkout registers.

(5) The sealer shall verify that the lowest advertised, posted, marked, displayed, or quoted price is the same as the price displayed or computed by the point-of-sale equipment or printed receipt. Only items computed at a higher price than the lowest advertised, posted, marked, displayed, or quoted price shall be considered not in compliance.

(6) The minimum random sample size shall not apply to inspections of any establishment at which fewer items than the number specified as the minimum sample size are marked or displayed with a posted or advertised item price.

(7) The maximum percentage of sale item restriction in paragraph (1) shall not apply to inspections of any establishment at which a marketing or promotional practice does not enable the sampling of the minimum required percentage of nonsale items, such as “Everything In Store 50 percent Off” or the like.

(8) The compliance rate percentage of a retail establishment shall be determined by dividing the number of items in compliance by the sample size multiplied by 100.

(b) Enforcement action may be taken for any item not in compliance.

(c) The sealer may reinspect any retail facility that has a compliance rate of less than 98 percent.

(d) The board of supervisors, by ordinance, may charge a point-of-sale system inspection fee or an annual registration fee, not to exceed the county’s total cost of inspecting or testing the accuracy of prices accessed or generated by the system pursuant to this section.

(e) The board of supervisors, by ordinance, may charge a reinspection fee for reinspections of a retail establishment that fails the prior inspection, not to exceed the county’s total cost of reinspecting or testing the accuracy of prices accessed or generated by the system pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 434, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

13351.

For purposes of this chapter, “random sample” of items means that the selection process shall be modeled after the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130, 2005 Edition (HB 130) – Examination Procedures for Price Verification, randomized sample collection; stratified sample collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 529, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13352.

For purposes of this chapter, “point-of-sale” system means any computer or electronic system used by a retail establishment such as, but not limited to, Universal Product Code scanners, price lookup codes, or an electronic price lookup system as a means for determining the price of the item being purchased by a consumer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 566, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.

For the purposes of this chapter, “sale items” include any item that is represented or advertised to be lower in price from that which the item is normally offered for sale. A “sale item” includes but is not limited to, an item that is represented as “promotional,” “limited time offer,” a “manager special,” “discount taken at register,” or displayed with any other advertisements that offers or suggests a reduced price.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 529, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13354.

For purposes of this chapter, “area” means an “entire store,” a “department,” “grouping of shelves or displays,” or other “section” of a store as defined by the sealer from which samples are selected for verification. “Nonpublic” areas of a store, such as the area in a pharmacy in which controlled drugs are kept or product storage rooms, shall not be included.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 529, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13355.

For the purposes of this chapter, “initial standard inspection” means an inspection made at the customary time interval used by an enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 529, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13356.

All other inspections of the point-of-sale system are considered “special inspections,” including, but not limited to, inspections pertaining to investigations, consumer complaints, complaints from competing businesses or a reinspection of a retail establishment at which one or more price accuracy violations have occurred within the previous six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 434, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Fuels and Lubricants [13400. - 13620.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [13400. - 13405.]

13400.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms mean the following:

(a) “Advertising medium” includes banner, sign, placard, poster, streamer, and card.

(b) “Alternative fuels” means:

(1) “Biodiesel,” a fuel comprised of mono-alkyl esters of long chain fatty acids derived from plant or animal matter that meets the requirements of the ASTM International Standard Specification D6751 “Standard Specification for Biodiesel Fuel Blend Stock (B100) for Middle Distillate Fuels.”

(2) “Biodiesel blend,” a fuel comprised of biodiesel
 mixed with diesel fuel that meets the requirements of ASTM International Standard Specification D7467.

(3) “Dimethyl ether,” an organic compound meant for combustion in compression-ignition engines that meets the requirements of dimethyl ether prescribed in this chapter.

(4) “Dimethyl ether-propane fuel blend,” a motor vehicle fuel consisting primarily of liquefied petroleum gas meeting the requirements of ASTM International Standard Specification D1835 mixed with dimethyl ether meeting the requirements of ASTM International Standard Specification D7901.

(5) “Electricity,” electrical energy transferred to or stored onboard an electric vehicle primarily for the purpose of propulsion.

(6) “Ethanol,” denatured motor fuel ethanol meeting the requirements of ASTM International Standard Specification D4806.

(7) “Ethanol fuel blend,” a motor vehicle fuel consisting primarily of ethanol mixed with gasoline meeting the standards prescribed for ethanol fuel blends by this chapter.

(8) “Hydrogen,” a fuel consisting of high purity hydrogen
 intended for consumption in a motor vehicle with an internal combustion engine or fuel cell that meets the standards for hydrogen prescribed by this chapter.

(9) “Methanol fuel blend,” a motor vehicle fuel consisting primarily of methanol mixed with gasoline meeting the standards prescribed by this chapter.

(10) “Natural gas,” a gaseous mixture of hydrocarbon compounds consisting of primarily methane in the form of a compressed gas or a cryogenic liquid intended for use as a motor vehicle fuel.

(11) “Propane,” a liquefied petroleum gas intended for use as a motor vehicle fuel and meeting the standards prescribed by this chapter.

(12) Any other fuel intended for use as a motor vehicle fuel that the secretary determines is an alternative fuel that has a standard specification from a standards development organization accredited by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI), or an interim standard specification pursuant to Section 13446.

(c) “Automotive spark-ignition engine fuel” means a product used for the generation of power in a spark-ignition internal combustion engine.

(d) “Compression-ignition engine fuel” means a product used for the generation of power in a compression-ignition internal combustion engine.

(e) “Developmental engine fuel” means an engine fuel that does not meet standards established by this chapter but has characteristics
 that may lead to an improved fuel standard or the development of an alternative fuel standard.

(f) “Diesel fuel” means any hydrocarbon oil meant for combustion in compression-ignition engines offered for sale that meets the standards for diesel fuel prescribed by this chapter.

(g) “Engine fuel” means any gasoline, diesel, or alternative fuel used for the generation of power in an internal combustion engine or fuel cell in a motor vehicle, or electrical power delivered conductively or inductively to an electric motor in electric or plug-in hybrid vehicles. “Motor vehicle fuel” means “engine fuel” when that term is used in this chapter.

(h) “Fuel oil” means any product offered for sale that is burned in a furnace or boiler for the
 generation of heat and meets the standards prescribed for fuel oil by this chapter.

(i) “Gasoline” means a volatile mixture of liquid hydrocarbons, generally containing small amounts of additives, suitable for use as a fuel in a spark-ignition internal combustion engine.

(j) “Gasoline-oxygenate blend” means a fuel consisting primarily of gasoline along with a substantial amount of one or more oxygenates that meets ASTM International Standard D4814.

(k) “Kerosene” means a fuel offered for sale that meets the standards for kerosene prescribed in this chapter.

(l) “Lubricant” means a lubricating oil or other substance that reduces friction and wear between moving parts
 within an engine and other motor vehicle components.

(m) “Lubricating oil” means motor oil, engine lubricant, engine oil, lubricating axle oil, gear oil, or manual transmission fluid.

(n) “Manufacturer” means manufacturer, refiner, producer, or importer.

(o) “Motor oil” means an oil that reduces friction and wear between the moving parts within an internal combustion engine and also serves as a coolant. For purposes of this chapter, motor oil also means engine oil.

(p) “Motor vehicle fuel” means an engine fuel intended for consumption in, including, but not limited to, an internal combustion engine, fuel cell, or electric motor to produce power to
 self-propel a vehicle designed for transporting persons or property on a public street or highway.

(q) “Octane number” or “antiknock index number,” when used in this chapter, means that number assigned to a spark-ignition engine fuel that designates the antiknock quality. The “octane number” or “antiknock index number” shall be determined according to the ASTM International method or methods designated in the latest ASTM International Standard Specification D4814.

(r) “Oxygenate” means an oxygen-containing ashless organic compound, such as an alcohol or ether, that can be used as a fuel or fuel supplement.

(s) “Renewable diesel fuel” means a diesel fuel derived from nonpetroleum renewable resources. Renewable diesel
 fuel does not include biodiesel, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(t) “Sell” or any of its variants means attempt to sell, offer for sale or assist in the sale of, permit to be sold or offered for sale or delivery, offer for delivery, trade, barter, or expose for sale.

(u) “Standard test” means a test conducted in accordance with the latest published standard adopted by ASTM International.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 117, Sec. 1.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13404.

(a) The sale of compressed natural gas by persons who sell compressed natural gas at retail to the public for use only as a motor vehicle fuel, and who are exempted from public utility status by subdivision (f) of Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code, is a sale of a motor fuel for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Compressed natural gas sold at retail to the public for use as a motor vehicle fuel shall be sold in a gasoline gallon equivalent that shall be equal to 126.67 cubic feet, or 5.66 pounds, of compressed natural gas, measured at the standard pressure and temperature, described in Section 8615 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) Liquefied natural gas sold at retail to the public for use as a motor vehicle fuel shall be sold in a diesel gallon equivalent that shall be equal to 6.06 pounds of liquefied natural gas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   (AB 1907)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13404.5.

The secretary shall establish the method of sale of motor vehicle fuels and lubricants sold at retail to the public. In doing so, the secretary shall adopt, by reference, the latest method of sale for motor vehicle fuels and lubricants adopted by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130 “Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Fuel Quality,” except as specifically provided by the Legislature or modified, amended, or rejected by regulations adopted by the secretary. In the absence of national standards, the secretary may adopt interim standards of method of sale until the time when the standards are adopted by the National Council on Weights and
 Measures and published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 31.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13405.

(a) The department may grant a variance from the specifications of this chapter for developmental engine fuels if all of the following conditions apply:

(1) Variances may only be granted to provide for the development of information under controlled test conditions to assist in the creation of chemical and performance standards for engine fuels.

(2) Developmental engine fuel shall only be distributed or sold to fleet-type centrally fueled vehicle and equipment users.

(3) The applicant shall warn all parties in writing of any potential risk associated with
 the use of the developmental engine fuel.

(4) The applicant shall report information when and as the department may prescribe in order for the department to monitor the progress of the developmental engine fuel technology evaluation.

(b) The applicant for a variance shall comply with all other requirements, terms, and conditions contained in this division and regulations adopted by the department to further the purposes and administration of this section.

(c) (1) In granting a variance, the department expresses no opinion as to whether an applicant’s developmental engine fuel will perform as represented by the applicant nor any opinion to the extent, if at all, that the developmental engine fuel may be safely and effectively used as a substitute for other spark-ignition or compression-ignition
 engine fuels without incident.

(2) Damages caused by the sale, delivery, storage, handling, and usage of the developmental engine fuel shall be addressed in accordance with contractual provisions negotiated and agreed upon by the applicant and the user.

(d) The department may withdraw a variance if the applicant does not adhere to the conditions required to obtain the variance or if the department recognizes a high probability of equipment harm with the continued use of the developmental engine fuel or to protect public safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 8.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sale of Motor Vehicle Fuels and Lubricants [13410. - 13413.]

13410.

(a) No person engaged in the business of extracting oil or gas from lands within the state, or of producing motor vehicle fuels for sale within the state, may refuse to sell to any city or county sufficient quantities of his or her motor vehicle fuels or lubricants, or both, sold during the normal course of business for the essential services provided by the city or county.

(b) The board of supervisors of a county or its designated county agency, upon application for the purchase of motor vehicle fuels or lubricants, or both, to perform essential services by a city within that county, by any agency of such city or county that performs an essential service, or by any transit district
 created pursuant to law, may arrange for the purchase and shall apportion the purchase among all persons specified in subdivision (a) who engage in the sale of motor vehicle fuels or lubricants, or both, within that county. The board of supervisors or its designated county agency shall, to the extent possible, apportion the total purchase of the motor vehicle fuels or lubricants, or both, on the basis of the persons’ sales of that motor vehicle fuel or lubricant, or both, in the county during the most recent 90-day period for which information is available.

(c) For purposes of this section, “essential services” means police, fire, health, and transportation services provided by public agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 10.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13411.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer to sell motor vehicle fuel for use in any vehicle, as the term vehicle is defined by the Vehicle Code, on the condition that the purchaser also must purchase or pay for any other products, merchandise, or services. This section does not apply to parking time charges at locations also selling electricity as a motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 11.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13413.

(a) It is unlawful for any person or other legal entity to make any deceptive, false, or misleading statement by any means whatever regarding quality, quantity, performance, price, discount, or saving used in the sale or selling of any commodity regulated pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The following misleading, unfair, or deceptive acts or practices committed or permitted by any person offering for sale any product that is regulated by this chapter are also a violation of this section:

(1) Misrepresenting the brand, grade, quality, or price of a motor vehicle fuel or lubricant.

(2) Using false or deceptive representations or designations in connection with the sale of motor vehicle fuels or lubricants.

(3) Advertising motor vehicle fuels or lubricants or services and not selling them as advertised.

(4) Advertising motor vehicle fuels or lubricants of a designated brand, grade, trademark, or trade name not actually sold or available for sale.

(5) Making false, deceptive, or misleading statements concerning conditions of sale or price reductions.

(6) Representing that the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other economic benefit and then failing to give that rebate, discount, or other economic benefit.

(7) Except as otherwise permitted, selling a grade of motor vehicle fuel at more than one price and advertising only the lower price without advertising each of the higher prices in equal size numerals on the same advertising medium.

(8) Placing letters, words, figures, or numerals on any advertising medium offering for sale any goods or merchandise, other than motor vehicle fuel, if the advertising medium may be construed by any reasonable person as advertising a price of motor vehicle fuel.

(9) Forging or falsifying any records or documents required by this chapter or knowingly keeping, using, or displaying the false or forged records or documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 12.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hours of Business [13420. - 13422.]

13420.

Every person, firm, partnership, association, trustee, or corporation that owns, leases, or rents and operates a facility that offers any motor vehicle fuel for sale to the public from a fueling facility abutting or adjacent to a street or highway shall accurately update all signs, banners, or other advertising media that indicate hours of the sale. Advertising media indicating hours of sale shall be updated on a monthly basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 13.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13421.

Every person, firm, partnership, association, trustee, or corporation that owns, leases, or rents and operates a facility that offers any motor vehicle fuel for sale to the public from the facility abutting or adjacent to a street or highway shall turn off all outdoor lighted advertising media at their place of business when they are not open for business. This section shall only apply to the fueling facility and not the retail business in a situation where the fueling facility is a part of and adjacent to a retail business provided the retail sale of gasoline or other motor vehicle fuel is not the primary purpose of that business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 14.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13422.

A violation of this article is an infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 46.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Motor Oil Fee [13430. - 13434.]

13430.

As used in this article, “motor oil dealer” means any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of producing, packaging, or otherwise preparing motor oil for market, or selling or distributing motor oil.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, and for the purpose of this article, “motor oil” means any product used to lubricate the moving parts of an internal combustion engine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13431.

The following persons shall pay to the secretary a maximum fee of five cents ($0.05) for each gallon of motor oil sold or purchased on or after January 1, 2010, as hereinafter provided:

(a) The first person who produced the motor oil shall pay the fee when the motor oil is sold to any retail establishment or motor oil dealer including any sold to the federal government, or its agencies.

(b) A retailer shall pay the fee for motor oil received when he or she transports or causes to be transported motor oil into this state from out of state.

(c) On any other sale of motor oil the dealer shall pay the fee except that this subdivision shall not apply to any person selling motor oil at retail.

(d) The assessment provided for in this section shall only be paid once on any particular motor oil.

The secretary may apply a
 fee of three cents ($0.03) for each gallon of motor oil sold or purchased, as provided in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, prior to the adoption of regulations.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to motor oil exported for sale outside this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (SB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

13432.

The fees provided in Section 13431 are maximum fees and may be established at a lower rate by the secretary at any time the funds derived from such assessment are more than reasonably necessary to cover the cost of administration and enforcement of this chapter, including the maintenance of a reasonable reserve fund for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 69.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13433.

The secretary may, by regulation, prescribe the frequency of payments of such assessments, the procedures for such payment, the procedures for refunds of payment, and penalties for late payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 70.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13434.

The moneys which are received by the secretary pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and shall be used only for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 13700).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 71.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Standards for Spark-Ignition Fuels [13440. - 13443.]

13440.

(a) The department shall establish specifications for automotive spark-ignition engine fuels. The department shall adopt by reference the latest standards established by a recognized consensus organization or standards writing organization such as ASTM International or SAE International, for automotive spark-ignition engine fuel, except that no specification shall be less stringent than required by any California state law.
